Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Cross references. —

As to public lands and donations, see art. 18, Wyo. Const.

As to eminent domain, see chapter 26 of title 1.

As to disposition of public land revenues, and establishment of permanent land fund, see §§

9-4-305

through

9-4-310

.

As to Taylor Grazing Act funds, see §

9-4-401

et seq.

As to forest reserve funds, see §

9-4-501

et seq.

As to conservation districts, see chapter 16 of title 11.

As to annexation by cities and towns, see §

15-1-401

et seq.

As to public parks, see §

15-7-301

et seq.

As to authority of fairgrounds, airports, parks, pleasure grounds and recreational systems, see chapter 9 of title 18.

As to assessments on state lands in connection with drainage districts, see §

41-9-240

et seq.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Fifty Years of Rhetoric on the Range: Reframing the Debate on Public Land Management,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 339 (1997).

For article, “The Bureau of Land Management: A Half-Century of Challenges and Change,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 345 (1997).

For article, “The Rise and Fall of Grazing Reform,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 413 (1997).

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
63.01 (Matthew Bender).